Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB267.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 104(b)(8) of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 104. Application.* * *(b) Exclusions.--This act shall not apply to any of the following:* * *(8) Temporary structures which are:(i) [Erected] erected for the purpose of participation in a fair, flea market, arts and crafts 1234567891011121314151617181920 festival or other public celebration[.];(ii) [Less] less than 1,600 square feet in size[.];(iii) [Erected] erected for a period of less than 30 days[.];(iv) [Not] not a swimming pool, spa or hot tub[.]; and(v) [Subject] subject to section 503(a)(2).* * *(11) Decks that are:(i) No more than 30 inches above grade at any point.(ii) Attached or accessory to a residential building.(12) Accessory structures that are:(i) attached to a residential building that cover an entranceway; and(ii) no more than one story high and not more than 200 square feet.(13) Patio covers as defined in Appendix I of the 2009 International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings or its successor requirement.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0267PN0220 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122